Connecticut, session 2026, SB00144.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Section 16-50j of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
2 is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective
3 October 1, 2026):
4 (a) There is established the Connecticut Siting Council, hereinafter
5 referred to in this chapter as the "council", which shall be within the
6 Department of Energy and Environmental Protection for administrative
7 purposes only.
8 (b) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, the council
9 shall consist of: (1) The Commissioner of Energy and Environmental
10 Protection, or the commissioner's designee; (2) the chairperson of the
11 Public Utilities Regulatory Authority, or the chairperson's designee; (3)
12 one designee of the speaker of the House and one designee of the
13 president pro tempore of the Senate; and (4) five public members, to be
SB144 / File No. 47 1

SB144 File No. 47
14 appointed by the Governor, at least two of whom shall be experienced
15 in the field of ecology, and all five of whom shall, consistent with the
16 provisions of section 4-9a, have no substantial financial interest in, not
17 be employed in or by, and not be professionally affiliated with any (A)
18 utility, (B) facility, (C) hazardous waste facility, as defined in section
19 22a-115, or (D) ash residue disposal area, and shall have had no
20 professional affiliation with any such utility, facility, hazardous waste
21 facility or ash residue disposal area for three years preceding such
22 public member's appointment to the council.
23 (c) For proceedings under chapter 445, the council shall consist of (1)
24 the Commissioners of Public Health and Emergency Services and Public
25 Protection or their designated representatives; (2) the designees of the
26 speaker of the House of Representatives and the president pro tempore
27 of the Senate as provided in subsection (b) of this section; (3) the five
28 public members as provided in subsection (b) of this section; and (4) four
29 ad hoc members, appointed by the chief elected official of the
30 municipality each such member represents, three of whom shall be
31 electors from the municipality in which the proposed facility is to be
32 located and one of whom shall be an elector from a neighboring
33 municipality likely to be most affected by the proposed facility.
34 (d) For any proceeding that occurs on or after the effective date of this
35 section, in addition to the membership provided for in subsection (b) or
36 (c) of this section, as applicable, the council shall consist of one elector
37 from the municipality in which such facility is proposed to be located,
38 as appointed by the chief elected official of such municipality. In the
39 event that such facility will be located in two or more municipalities,
40 one such elector shall be appointed by the applicable regional council of
41 governments for the affected municipalities. Each such member shall
42 serve as a nonvoting member for purposes of such proceeding and shall
43 abide by all applicable rules of confidentiality concerning such
44 proceeding.
45 [(d)] (e) For the appointment of ad hoc members in accordance with
46 subsection (c) of this section, the municipality most affected by the
SB144 / File No. 47 2

SB144 File No. 47
47 proposed facility shall be determined by the permanent members of the
48 council. If any one of the five public members or of the designees of the
49 speaker of the House of Representatives or the president pro tempore of
50 the Senate resides (1) in the municipality in which a hazardous waste
51 facility is proposed to be located for a proceeding concerning a
52 hazardous waste facility or in which a low-level radioactive waste
53 facility is proposed to be located for a proceeding concerning a low-level
54 radioactive waste facility, or (2) in the neighboring municipality likely
55 to be most affected by the proposed facility, the appointing authority
56 shall appoint a substitute member for the proceedings on such proposal.
57 If any appointee is unable to perform such appointee's duties on the
58 council due to illness, or has a substantial financial or employment
59 interest which is in conflict with the proper discharge of the appointee's
60 duties under this chapter, the appointing authority shall appoint a
61 substitute member for proceedings on such proposal. An appointee
62 shall report any substantial financial or employment interest which
63 might conflict with the proper discharge of the appointee's duties under
64 this chapter to the appointing authority who shall determine if such
65 conflict exists. If any state agency is the applicant, an appointee shall not
66 be deemed to have a substantial employment conflict of interest because
67 of employment with the state unless such appointee is directly
68 employed by the state agency making the application. Ad hoc members
69 shall continue their membership until the council issues a letter of
70 completion of the development and management plan to the applicant.
71 [(e)] (f) The chairperson of the council shall be appointed by the
72 Governor from among the five public members appointed by the
73 Governor, with the advice and consent of the House or Senate, and shall
74 serve as chairperson at the pleasure of the Governor.
75 [(f)] (g) The public members of the council, including the chairperson,
76 the members appointed by the speaker of the House and president pro
77 tempore of the Senate and the four ad hoc members specified in
78 subsection (c) of this section, shall be compensated for their attendance
79 at public hearings, executive sessions, or other council business as may
80 require their attendance at the rate of two hundred dollars, provided in
SB144 / File No. 47 3

SB144 File No. 47
81 no case shall the daily compensation exceed two hundred dollars.
82 [(g)] (h) The council shall employ such employees as may be
83 necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter, and such
84 employees shall, in the aggregate, have sufficient expertise in
85 engineering and financial analysis to carry out the provisions of this
86 chapter.
87 [(h)] (i) The council shall, in addition to its other duties prescribed in
88 this chapter, adopt, amend, or rescind suitable regulations to carry out
89 the provisions of this chapter and the policies and practices of the
90 council in connection therewith, and appoint and prescribe the duties of
91 such staff as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.
92 The chairperson of the council, with the consent of five or more other
93 members of the council, may appoint an executive director, who shall
94 be the chief administrative officer of the Connecticut Siting Council. The
95 executive director shall be exempt from classified service.
96 [(i)] (j) Prior to commencing any hearing pursuant to section 16-50m,
97 the council shall consult with and solicit written comments from (1) the
98 Departments of Energy and Environmental Protection, Public Health,
99 Agriculture, Economic and Community Development and
100 Transportation and the Council on Environmental Quality, the Public
101 Utilities Regulatory Authority, the Office of Policy and Management
102 and the Office of Consumer Counsel, and (2) in a hearing pursuant to
103 section 16-50m, for a facility described in subdivision (3) of subsection
104 (a) of section 16-50i, the Department of Emergency Services and Public
105 Protection, the Department of Administrative Services, the Labor
106 Department and the Office of Consumer Counsel. Copies of such
107 comments shall be made available to all parties prior to the
108 commencement of the hearing. Subsequent to the commencement of the
109 hearing, said departments, Council on Environmental Quality,
110 authority and offices may file additional written comments with the
111 Connecticut Siting Council within such period of time as the
112 Connecticut Siting Council designates. All such written comments shall
113 be made part of the record, as provided in section 16-50o. Said
SB144 / File No. 47 4

SB144 File No. 47
114 departments, Council on Environmental Quality, authority and offices
115 shall not enter any contract or agreement with any party to the
116 proceedings or hearings described in this section or section 16-50p that
117 requires said departments, Council on Environmental Quality,
118 authority or offices to withhold or retract comments, refrain from
119 participating in or withdraw from said proceedings or hearings.
120 Sec. 2. Subsection (b) of section 16-50l of the 2026 supplement to the
121 general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
122 thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
123 (b) Each application shall be accompanied by proof of service of a
124 copy of such application on: (1) Each municipality in which any portion
125 of such facility is to be located, both as primarily proposed and in the
126 alternative locations listed, and any adjoining municipality having a
127 boundary not more than two thousand five hundred feet from such
128 facility, which copy shall be served on the chief executive officer of each
129 such municipality and shall include notice of the date on or about which
130 the application is to be filed, and the zoning commissions, planning
131 commissions, planning and zoning commissions, conservation
132 commissions and inland wetlands agencies of each such municipality,
133 and the regional councils of governments which encompass each such
134 municipality; (2) the Attorney General; (3) each member of the
135 legislature in whose assembly or senate district the facility or any
136 alternative location listed in the application is to be located; (4) any
137 agency, department or instrumentality of the federal government that
138 has jurisdiction, whether concurrent with the state or otherwise, over
139 any matter that would be affected by such facility; (5) each state
140 department and agency named in subsection [(i)] (j) of section 16-50j, as
141 amended by this act; and (6) such other state and municipal bodies as
142 the council may by regulation designate. A notice of such application
143 shall be given to the general public, in municipalities entitled to receive
144 notice under subdivision (1) of this subsection, by the publication of a
145 summary of such application and the date on or about which it will be
146 filed. Such notice shall be published under the regulations to be
147 promulgated by the council, in such form and in such newspapers as
SB144 / File No. 47 5

SB144 File No. 47
148 will serve substantially to inform the public of such application and to
149 afford interested persons sufficient time to prepare for and to be heard
150 at the hearing prescribed in section 16-50m. Such notice shall be
151 published in not less than ten-point type. A notice of such an application
152 for a certificate for a facility described in subdivision (3), (4), (5) or (6) of
153 subsection (a) of section 16-50i shall also be sent, by certified or
154 registered mail, to each person appearing of record as an owner of
155 property which abuts the proposed primary or alternative sites on
156 which the facility would be located. Such notice shall be sent at the same
157 time that notice of such application is given to the general public. Notice
158 of an application for a certificate for a facility described in subdivision
159 (1) of subsection (a) of section 16-50i shall also be provided to each
160 electric distribution company customer in the municipality where the
161 facility is proposed to be placed. Such notice shall (A) be provided on a
162 separate enclosure with each customer's monthly bill for one or more
163 months, (B) be provided by the electric distribution company not earlier
164 than sixty days prior to filing the application with the council, but not
165 later than the date that the application is filed with the council, and (C)
166 include: A brief description of the project, including its location relative
167 to the affected municipality and adjacent streets; a brief technical
168 description of the project including its proposed length, voltage, and
169 type and range of heights of support structures or underground
170 configuration; the reason for the project; the address and a toll-free
171 telephone number of the applicant by which additional information
172 about the project can be obtained; and a statement in print no smaller
173 than twenty-four-point type size stating "NOTICE OF PROPOSED
174 CONSTRUCTION OF A HIGH VOLTAGE ELECTRIC
175 TRANSMISSION LINE".
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 16-50j
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 16-50l(b)
ENV Joint Favorable
SB144 / File No. 47 6

SB144 File No. 47
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
CT Siting Council SCF1 - Cost See Below See Below
Note: SCF=Siting Council Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill results in a cost to the Connecticut Siting Council, as it
requires (on or after October 1, 2026), any Connecticut Siting Council
proceeding to include a local electorate from the municipality where a
subject facility is being proposed.
In FY 25, the Connecticut Siting Council held 25 regular meetings and
22 public hearings. It is estimated that at each regularly held meeting
there could be an additional five to ten local representatives in
attendance, resulting in an additional cost of approximately $1,000-
$2,000 per meeting2 ($25,000 - $50,000 annually). Additional costs may
occur if local representatives also attend the public hearings. The total
cost to the fund would be dependent upon the total number of regular
meetings and public hearings held, and the total number of local
representatives in attendance.
1Pursuant to Connecticut General Statutes (C.G.S.) §16-50r and §16-50v, the Council’s
budget is financed by fees and assessments paid to the Siting Council Fund.
2Public members of the council are compensated for their attendance at public
hearings, executive sessions, or other council business at a rate of $200 per activity,
capped at $200 a day.
SB144 / File No. 47 7

SB144 File No. 47
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to the number of meetings and hearings
held and the number of compensated representatives in attendance.
SB144 / File No. 47 8

SB144 File No. 47
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 144
AN ACT PROVIDING FOR LOCAL REPRESENTATION ON THE
CONNECTICUT SITING COUNCIL.